Alaska, session 34, HB227.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 14.57.210(b) is amended to read: 05 (b) To acquire title under (a) of this section, the museum shall publish a notice 06 for at least four consecutive weeks on a dedicated Internet webpage maintained 07 by the museum responsible for the undocumented property and at least once a 08 week for four consecutive weeks in either a newspaper of general circulation in the 09 judicial district where the museum is located or on a social media account 10 maintained by the museum. The notice must include 11 (1) a brief and general description of the property; 12 (2) the date or approximate date, if known, of the acquisition of the 13 property by the museum; 14 (3) the name, address, electronic mail address, and telephone number 01 of the museum representative to contact for more information or to make a claim of 02 ownership; 03 (4) the initial date of publication on the Internet webpage [DATE 04 OF THE LAST PUBLICATION OF THE NOTICE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION]; 05 and 06 (5) a statement that the museum will acquire title to the property if a 07 valid claim of an owner to the property is not received by the museum within 45 days 08 from the date of the last publication of the notice under this subsection. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.